src/braille/thirdparty/liblouis/tables/tr-g2.ctb
# Kelime Kökü Kısaltmaları
midendword ınca 45-14
midendword ince 45-14
midendword unca 45-14
midendword ünce 45-14
midendword ıncı 56-14
midendword inci 56-14
midendword uncu 56-14
midendword üncü 56-14
midendword tıkları 45-145
midendword tikleri 45-145
midendword tukları 45-145
midendword tükleri 45-145
midendword tıkça 45-16
midendword tikçe 45-16
midendword tukça 45-16
midendword tükçe 45-16
midendword dıkça 56-2345
midendword dikçe 56-2345
midendword dukça 56-2345
midendword dükçe 56-2345
midendword dıkları 56-145
midendword dikleri 56-145
midendword dukları 56-145
midendword dükleri 56-145
midendword lara 45-15
midendword lere 45-15
midendword ları 56-15
midendword leri 56-15
midendword gan 45-1245
midendword gen 45-1245
midendword gın 56-1245
midendword gin 56-1245
midendword gun 56-1245
midendword gün 56-1245
midendword mayı 45-126
midendword meyi 45-126
midendword mağa 56-126
midendword meğe 56-126
midendword tığı 45-24
midendword tiği 45-24
midendword tuğu 45-24
midendword tüğü 45-24
midendword dığı 56-24
midendword diği 56-24
midendword duğu 56-24
midendword düğü 56-24
midendword tır 45-245
midendword tir 45-245
midendword tur 45-245
midendword tür 45-245
midendword dır 56-245
midendword dir 56-245
midendword dur 56-245
midendword dür 56-245
midendword ken 56-13
midendword luk 45-123
midendword lük 45-123
midendword lık 56-123
midendword lik 56-123
midendword madan 56-134
midendword meden 56-134
midendword nun 45-1345
midendword nün 45-1345
midendword nın 56-1345
midendword nin 56-1345
midendword yor 56-135
midendword arak 56-1235
midendword erek 56-1235
midendword ması 56-234
midendword mesi 56-234
midendword muş 45-146
midendword müş 45-146
midendword mış 56-146
midendword miş 56-146
midendword tıktan 45-2345
midendword tikten 45-2345
midendword tuktan 45-2345
midendword tükten 45-2345
midendword dıktan 56-2345
midendword dikten 56-2345
midendword duktan 56-2345
midendword dükten 56-2345
midendword uyla 45-13456
midendword üyle 45-13456
midendword ıyla 56-13456
midendword iyle 56-13456
midendword suz 45-1356
midendword süz 45-1356
midendword sız 56-1356
midendword siz 56-1356
midendword sun 45-2346
midendword sün 45-2346
midendword sın 56-2346
midendword sin 56-2346
midendword lığa 45-12345
midendword liğe 45-12345
midendword luğa 45-12345
midendword lüğe 45-12345
midendword lığı 56-12345
midendword liği 56-12345
midendword luğu 56-12345
midendword lüğü 56-12345
midendword malı 56-34
midendword meli 56-34
midendword cak 45-12456
midendword cek 45-12456
midendword cağı 56-12456
midendword ceği 56-12456

# Özel Karakterler ve Türkçe için sözlük tanımları
literal :// URLs
literal www.
literal @ Mail-address
literal .com
literal .com.tr
literal .edu
literal .edu.tr
literal .gov
literal .gov.tr
literal .mil
literal .mil.tr
literal .net
literal .net.tr
literal .org
literal .org.tr
literal .doc
literal .htm
literal .html
literal .tex
literal .txt
literal .gif
literal .jpg
literal .png
literal .wav
literal .tar
literal .zip
always www 2456-2456-2456
always www. 2456-2456-2456-256
always .com 256-14-135-134
always .com.tr 256-14-135-134-256-2345-1235
begword kla 13-123-1
begword kli 13-123-24
begword klo 13-123-135
begword bra 12-1235-1
begword bre 12-1235-15
begword kbps 13-12-1234-234
